South Dakota, session 2026, HB1252.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 23A-40-7 be AMENDED:
23A-40-7. The board of county commissioners of each county and the governing
body of any municipality Commission on Indigent Legal Services shall provide for the
representation of indigent persons described in § 23A-40-6. The board or body
commission shall provide this representation by any or all of the following:
(1) Establishing and maintaining an office of a public defender;
(2) Arranging with the courts in the county to appoint attorneys on an equitable basis
through a systematic, coordinated plan; or
(3) Contracting with any attorney licensed to practice law in this state.
In those counties which have established an office of public defender, any
proceedings after judgment may be assigned to the public defender. The provisions of
chapter 5-18A do not apply to this section.
Section 2. That § 23A-40-8 be AMENDED:
23A-40-8. Except as provided below, counsel assigned pursuant to § 23A-40-6
and subdivision 23A-40-7(2) shall must, after the disposition of the cause, be paid by the
county in which the action is brought, or, in case of a parole revocation, by the county
from which the inmate was sentenced Commission on Indigent Legal Services, a
reasonable and just compensation for the services and for necessary expenses and costs
incident to the proceedings in an amount to be fixed by a judge of the circuit court or a
magistrate judge within guidelines established by the presiding judge of the circuit court.
If the cause originated from a criminal offense committed by an inmate under
confinement in a facility operated by the Department of Corrections, the Department of
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.912.23 2 1252
Corrections must, after the disposition of the cause, pay counsel assigned pursuant to
§ 23A-40-6, a reasonable and just compensation for the services and for necessary
expenses and costs incident to the proceedings in an amount to be fixed by a judge of the
circuit court or a magistrate judge within guidelines established by the presiding judge of
the circuit court.
Section 3. That § 23A-40-10 be AMENDED:
23A-40-10. If the court finds that funds moneys are available for payment from
or on behalf of a defendant to carry out, in whole or in part, the provisions of this chapter,
the court may order that the funds be paid, as court costs or as a condition of probation,
to the court for deposit with the state, county, or municipal treasurer, to be placed in the
state, county, or municipal general fund or in the public defender fund in those counties
establishing the office pursuant to subdivision 23A-40-7(1) as a reimbursement to the
county or municipality to carry out the provisions of this section. The court may also order
payment to be made in the form of installments or wage assignments, in amounts set by
a judge of the circuit court or a magistrate judge, either during the time a charge is
pending or after the disposition of the charge, regardless of whether the defendant has
been acquitted or the case has been dismissed by the prosecution or by order of the court.
The provisions of this section also apply to persons who have had counsel appointed under
chapters 26-7A, 26-8A, 26-8B, and 26-8C. The reimbursement is a credit against any lien
created by the provisions of this chapter against the property of the defendant.
Section 4. That § 23A-40-11 be AMENDED:
23A-40-11. A lien, enforceable as provided by this chapter, upon all the property,
both real and personal, of any person, including the parents of a minor child, for whom
legal counsel or a public defender has been appointed under the provisions of § 23A-40-
6, subdivisions 23A-40-7(2) and (3), or § 26-7A-31 may be filed. The services rendered
and expenses incurred are a claim against the person and that person's estate, enforceable
according to law in an amount to be determined by a judge of the circuit court or a
magistrate judge and paid by the county or municipality chargeable for them Commission
on Indigent Legal Services. A lien on the parents of a minor child pursuant to this section
may not exceed one thousand five hundred dollars plus an amount equal to any taxable
court costs.
Section 5. That § 23A-40-13 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.912.23 3 1252
23A-40-13. Immediately upon payment by the chargeable county or municipality
Commission on Indigent Legal Services, or upon the setting of the public defender's lien
by a circuit court judge or magistrate judge, a statement of claim showing the name and
residence of the recipient shall must be filed by the county auditor or municipal, finance
officer in the office of the register of deeds in the county where the recipient resides. A
certified copy of the lien may be filed in any other county in which the recipient may have
or may acquire an interest in real or personal property. The lien is enforceable, until
satisfied or compromised.
Section 6. That § 23A-40-20 be AMENDED:
23A-40-20. All moneys in the court appointed attorney and public defender
payment fund shall must be annually distributed by the state treasurer to the counties on
a pro rata basis. The state treasurer shall, within sixty days of the end of the fiscal year,
determine and verify from receipts and expenditure records the total expenditures by all
counties in the state for court appointed attorneys and public defender offices. He shall
then establish a percentage ratio between moneys collected in the fund for the past fiscal
year and the total expenditures by counties for court appointed attorneys and public
defender offices. That percentage ratio shall then be applied to each county's gross
expenditure for court appointed attorneys and public defender offices to determine its
respective payment from the fund general fund.
Section 7. That § 23A-51-8 be AMENDED:
23A-51-8. The Office of Indigent Legal Services shall provide statewide indigent
representation services in direct appeals in criminal cases, habeas corpus appeals, and
abuse or neglect of a child appeal cases, or cases provided in chapter 26-7A, 26-8A, 26-
8B, or 26-8C. The office may expand its scope of indigent representation services to
include additional case types as approved by the commission. The office shall determine
the method of delivering indigent representation services by utilizing public defenders,
private appointed attorneys, or a combination of both. The office may contract with private
appointed attorneys to deliver indigent representation and shall provide oversight and
review of any contracted attorneys.
Section 8. That § 26-7A-31 be AMENDED:
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.912.23 4 1252
26-7A-31. If the child or the child's parents, guardian, or other custodian requests
an attorney in proceedings under this chapter or chapter 26-8A, 26-8B, or 26-8C and if
the court finds the party to be without sufficient financial means to employ an attorney,
the court shall must appoint an attorney for the party. The court may appoint an attorney
for any child or any party to the proceedings without request of the party if the court
deems representation by an attorney necessary to protect the interests of the party.
Reasonable and just compensation for services of a court-appointed attorney and
for necessary expenses and costs incident to the proceedings shall must be determined
by the court within guidelines established by the presiding judge of the circuit court and
shall must be paid by the county in which the action is being conducted Commission on
Indigent Legal Services according to the manner prescribed by the court. If the court-
appointed attorney is a party to a contract with the county to provide indigent counsel
pursuant to subdivision 23A-40-7(3), the compensation for that attorney shall must be
that which the attorney would receive under the contract. This section does not preclude
the court from appointment of an attorney for a child as required by provisions of chapter
26-8A.
Section 9. There is appropriated $27,573,984 from the general fund, to the Commission on
Indigent Legal Services, to reimburse the cost of indigent legal services incurred by counties.
Section 10. The Commission on Indigent Legal Services shall distribute the moneys described
in section 9 of this Act to the counties based on the formula provided in this section. The
commission shall, within sixty days of the end of the fiscal year, determine and verify from
receipts and expenditure records the total expenditures by all counties for court appointed
attorneys and public defender offices. The commission shall then establish a percentage ratio
of the total expenditures by counties for court appointed attorneys and public defender offices.
The commission shall apply that percentage ratio to each county's gross expenditure for court
appointed attorneys and public defender offices to determine its respective payment.
Section 11. The chief defender of the Office of Indigent Services shall approve vouchers and
the state auditor shall draw warrants to pay expenditures authorized in this Act.
Section 12. Any amounts appropriated in this Act not lawfully expended or obligated shall
revert in accordance with the procedures prescribed in chapter 4-8.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.

26.912.23 5 1252
Section 13. Whereas, this Act is necessary for the support of the state government and its
existing public institutions, an emergency is hereby declared to exist, and sections 7 to 10,
inclusive, of this Act shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.
Section 14. Sections 1 to 8, inclusive, of this Act are effective July 1, 2028.
Section 15. Sections 9 to 13, inclusive, of this Act are effective June 30, 2026.
Underscores indicate new language.
Overstrikes indicate deleted language.